dev/verbs.chopped.dix
    <pardef n="dz/elt__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elšu</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elsim</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elsi</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elsiet</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elsit</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>els</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elt</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēlu</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēlām</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēli</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēlāt</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēla</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eļu</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eļam</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eļat</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eļ</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="si/sties__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tīšos</l>
          <r>sties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tīsimies</l>
          <r>sties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tīsies</l>
          <r>sties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tīsities</l>
          <r>sties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tīsieties</l>
          <r>sties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tīsies</l>
          <r>sties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sties</l>
          <r>sties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tos</l>
          <r>sties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tāmies</l>
          <r>sties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ties</l>
          <r>sties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tāties</l>
          <r>sties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tās</l>
          <r>sties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tos</l>
          <r>sties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tamies</l>
          <r>sties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ties</l>
          <r>sties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>taties</l>
          <r>sties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tas</l>
          <r>sties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ieg/ūt__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ūšu</l>
          <r>ūt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ūsim</l>
          <r>ūt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ūsi</l>
          <r>ūt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ūsiet</l>
          <r>ūt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ūsit</l>
          <r>ūt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ūs</l>
          <r>ūt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ūt</l>
          <r>ūt<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uvu</l>
          <r>ūt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uvām</l>
          <r>ūt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uvi</l>
          <r>ūt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uvāt</l>
          <r>ūt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uva</l>
          <r>ūt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ūstu</l>
          <r>ūt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ūstam</l>
          <r>ūt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ūsti</l>
          <r>ūt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ūstat</l>
          <r>ūt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ūst</l>
          <r>ūt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="atcelt"><i>atc</i><par n="dz/elt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pacelt"><i>pac</i><par n="dz/elt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="apmesties"><i>apme</i><par n="si/sties__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sisties"><i>si</i><par n="si/sties__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="izcelt"><i>izc</i><par n="dz/elt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="iegūt"><i>ieg</i><par n="ieg/ūt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dzelt"><i>dz</i><par n="dz/elt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="iecelt"><i>iec</i><par n="dz/elt__vblex"/></e>
